Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2628
Competitive Livestock Markets Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Competitive Livestock Markets Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the department. The fund shall consist of investigative and enforcement expense assessments against violators of the Competitive Livestock Markets Act and fees paid by a packer pursuant to section 54-2627. The money in the fund shall be used to defray the investigative, enforcement, and reporting expenses of the department in administering the act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 28.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.